Utah statutes.
54-10a-102.   Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1)  "Applicable public utility" means a public utility in this state for:

(a)  natural gas;

(b)  electricity; or

(c)  telephone.

(2)  "Committee" means the Committee of Consumer Services created in Section 54-10a-202.

(3)  "Director" means the director of the office appointed under Section 54-10a-201.

(4)  "Office" means the Office of Consumer Services created in Section 54-10a-201.

(5)  "Residential consumer" is a customer or user of an applicable public utility who maintains a permanent residence within the state.

(6)  "Small commercial consumer" is a person conducting a business enterprise, agriculture enterprise, or other enterprise in the state that has:

(a)  less than 25 employees; or

(b)  a gross income less than $1,000,000 annually.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 237, 2009 General Session

